dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="סי/ף__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פנו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפים</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפיי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפינו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפיך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפייך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפיו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יפיה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פיהם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="כ/ותונת__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ותונת</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תונת</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתי</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתנו</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתך</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתך</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתכם</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתכן</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתן</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתו</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתה</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותונתם</l><r>ותונת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="שי__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ין</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="עוני"><i>עוני</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ארי"><i>ארי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כותונת"><i>כ</i><par n="כ/ותונת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שי"><i>שי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משי"><i>משי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דלי"><i>דלי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אופי"><i>אופי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ראי"><i>ראי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חולי"><i>חולי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גדי"><i>גדי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עדי"><i>עדי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיף"><i>סי</i><par n="סי/ף__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עובי"><i>עובי</i><par n="שי__n_m"/></e>
